Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-12] Emergency management powers, in
general. (a) The governor or mayor, as applicable, may exercise the
following powers pertaining to emergency management:

(1) Prepare comprehensive plans and programs for the
protection of the State or county against all hazards, which shall be
integrated into and coordinated with the emergency management plans of the
State, counties, the federal government, other states, and private-sector and
nonprofit organizations;

(2) Identify emergency workers required to report for
duty as directed by the department head regardless of the availability of any
type of leave;

(3) Institute training, preparedness, and
public-information programs in coordination with the State, counties, the
federal government, other states, and private-sector and nonprofit
organizations;

(4) Provide or authorize suitable insignia of
authority for all authorized emergency management personnel; and

(5) Direct or control as may be necessary for
emergency management:

(A) Alerts, warnings, notifications,
activations, exercises, drills, and tests;

(B) Warnings and signals for alerts or
exercises, and any type of warning device, system, or method to be used in
connection therewith;

(C) Partial or full mobilization of personnel
for exercises or training, in advance of, or in response to, an actual
emergency or disaster; and

(D) The conduct of civilians and the movement
and cessation of movement of pedestrians and vehicular traffic during, before,
and after alerts, exercises, training, emergencies, or disasters.

(b) The governor may exercise the
following powers pertaining to emergency management:

(1) Support requests from a mayor for assistance in
preparing for, responding to, and recovering from any emergency or disaster or
threat thereof;

(2) Lease, lend, or otherwise furnish, on such terms
and conditions as the governor may consider necessary to promote the public
welfare and protect the interest of the State, any real or personal property of
the state government, to the President of the United States, the armed forces,
or to the emergency management agency of the United States;

(3) Enter into, participate in, or carry out mutual
aid agreements or compacts for emergency management or emergency management
functions with the federal government and with other states;

(4) Sponsor and develop mutual aid plans and
agreements for emergency management between the State, one or more counties,
and other governmental, private-sector, and nonprofit organizations, for the
furnishing or exchange of food, clothing, medicine, and other materials;
engineering services; emergency housing; police services; health, medical, and
related services; firefighting, rescue, transportation, and construction
services and facilities; personnel necessary to provide or conduct these
services; and such other materials, facilities, personnel, and services as may
be needed. The mutual aid plans and agreements may be made with or without
provisions for reimbursement of costs and expenses, and on such terms and
conditions as are deemed necessary;

(5) Take possession of, use, manage, control, and
reallocate any public property of the State, real or personal, required by the
governor for the purposes of this chapter, including airports, parks,
playgrounds, and schools, and other public buildings. Whenever the property is
so taken, the governor may make such provision for the temporary accommodation
of the government service affected thereby as the governor may deem advisable;

(6) Utilize all services, materials, and facilities
of nongovernmental agencies, relief organizations, community associations, and
other private-sector and nonprofit organizations that may be made available;

(7) Receive, expend, or use contributions or grants,
which shall be deemed to be trust funds, in money, property, or services, or
loans of property, or special contributions or grants in money, property, or
services, or loans of property, for special purposes provided for by this
chapter; establish funds in the state treasury for the deposit and expenditure
of the moneys; procure federal aid as the same may be available; and apply the
provisions of chapter 29 in cases of federal aid, even though not in the form
of money. The contributions or grants are appropriated for the purposes of
this chapter, or for the special purposes;

(8) Purchase, make, produce, construct, rent, lease,
or procure by condemnation or otherwise, transport, store, install, maintain,
and insure, repair, renovate, restore, replace or reconstruct, and distribute,
furnish or otherwise dispose of, with or without charges, materials and
facilities for emergency management; and to procure federal aid therefor
whenever feasible. Chapter 103D and sections 103-50, 103-53, 103-55, 105-1 to
105-10, and 464-4 shall not apply to any emergency management functions of the
governor to the extent that the governor finds that the provisions, in whole or
in part, impede or tend to impede the expeditious discharge of those functions,
or that compliance therewith is impracticable due to existing conditions;

(9) Provide for the appointment, employment,
training, equipping, and maintaining with compensation, or on a volunteer basis
without compensation and without regard to chapters 76, 78, and 88, of such
agencies, officers, and other persons as the governor deems necessary to carry
out the purposes of this chapter; to determine to what extent any law
prohibiting the holding of more than one office or employment applies to the
agencies, officers, and other persons; and subject to provisions of this chapter,
to provide for the interchange of personnel, by detail, transfer, or otherwise,
between agencies or departments of the State;

(10) Make charges in such cases and in such amounts as
the governor deems advisable, for any property sold, work performed, services
rendered, or accommodations or facilities furnished by the State under this
chapter;

(11) Make or authorize such contracts as may be
necessary to carry out this chapter;

(12) Establish special accounting forms and practices
whenever necessary;

(13) Require each public utility, or any person
owning, controlling, or operating a critical infrastructure facility as
identified by the governor, to protect and safeguard its or the person's
property, or to provide for the protection and safeguarding thereof; and
provide for the protection and safeguarding of all critical infrastructure and
key resources; provided that without prejudice to the generality of the
foregoing two clauses, the protecting and safeguarding may include the
regulation or prohibition of public entry thereon, or the permission of the
entry upon such terms and conditions as the governor may prescribe;

(14) Restrict the congregation of the public in
stricken or dangerous areas or under dangerous conditions;

(15) Direct and control the non-compulsory evacuation
of the civilian population;

(16) Order and direct government agencies, officials,
officers, and employees of the State, to take such action and employ such
measures for law enforcement, medical, health, firefighting, traffic control,
warnings and signals, engineering, rescue, construction, emergency housing,
other welfare, hospitalization, transportation, water supply, public
information, training, and other emergency functions as may be necessary, and
utilize the services, materials, and facilities of the agencies and officers. All
such agencies and officers shall cooperate with and extend their services,
materials, and facilities to the governor as the governor may request;

(17) Provide for the repair and maintenance of public
property, whenever adequate provision therefor is not otherwise made; insure
the property against any emergency or disaster; provide for the restoration,
renovation, replacement, or reconstruction of insured property in the event of
damage or loss; and make temporary restoration of public utilities and other
critical infrastructure facilities in the event of an emergency or disaster;

(18) Fix or revise the hours of government business;
and

(19) Take any and all steps necessary or appropriate
to carry out the purposes of this chapter notwithstanding that those powers in
section 127A-13(a) may only be exercised during an emergency period.

(c) The mayor may exercise the following
powers pertaining to emergency management:

(1) Lease, lend, or otherwise furnish, on such terms
and conditions as the mayor may consider necessary to promote the public
welfare and protect the interest of the county, any real or personal property
of the county government, to the governor of the State, to the mayors of the
other counties of the State, or to the agency;

(2) Sponsor and develop mutual aid plans and
agreements for emergency management between one or more counties, and other
governmental, private-sector, or nonprofit organizations, for the furnishing or
exchange of food, clothing, medicine, and other materials; engineering
services; emergency housing; police services; health, medical, and related
services; firefighting, rescue, transportation, and construction services and
facilities; personnel necessary to provide or conduct these services; and such
other materials, facilities, personnel, and services as may be needed. The
mutual aid plans and agreements may be made with or without provisions for
reimbursement of costs and expenses, and on such terms and conditions as are
deemed necessary;

(3) Take possession of, use, manage, control, and
reallocate any public property of the county, real or personal, required by the
mayor for the purposes of this chapter, including parks, playgrounds, and other
public buildings. Whenever the property is so taken, the mayor may make such
provision for the temporary accommodation of the government service affected as
the mayor may deem advisable;

(4) Utilize all services, materials, and facilities
of nongovernmental agencies, relief organizations, community associations, and
other private-sector and nonprofit organizations that may be made available;

(5) Receive, expend, or use contributions or grants,
which shall be deemed to be trust funds, in money, property, or services, or
loans of property, or special contributions or grants in money, property, or
services, or loans of property, for special purposes provided for by this
chapter; establish funds in the treasury for the deposit and expenditure of the
moneys; and procure federal aid as the same may be available. The
contributions or grants are appropriated for the purposes of this chapter, or
for the special purposes;

(6) Purchase, make, produce, construct, rent, lease,
or procure by condemnation or otherwise, transport, store, install, maintain,
and insure, repair, renovate, restore, replace or reconstruct, and distribute,
furnish or otherwise dispose of, with or without charges, materials and
facilities for emergency management; and to procure federal aid therefor
whenever feasible. Chapter 103D and sections 103-50, 103-53, 103-55, 105-1 to
105-10, and 464-4 shall not apply to any emergency management functions of and
to the extent that the mayor finds that the provisions, in whole or in part,
impede or tend to impede the expeditious discharge of the functions, or that
compliance therewith is impracticable due to existing conditions;

(7) Provide for the appointment, employment,
training, equipping, and maintaining, with compensation, or on a volunteer
basis without compensation and without regard to chapters 76, 78, and 88, of
such agencies, officers, and other persons as the mayor deems necessary to
carry out this chapter; to determine to what extent any law prohibiting the
holding of more than one office or position of employment applies to the
agencies, officers, and other persons; and subject to provisions of this
chapter, to provide for the interchange of personnel, by detail, transfer, or
otherwise, between agencies or departments of the county;

(8) Make charges in such cases and in such amounts as
the mayor deems advisable, for any property sold, work performed, services
rendered, or accommodations or facilities furnished by the county under this
chapter;

(9) Make or authorize such contracts as may be
necessary to carry out this chapter;

(10) Establish special accounting forms and practices
whenever necessary;

(11) Require each public utility, or any person
owning, controlling, or operating a critical infrastructure facility as
identified by the mayor, to protect and safeguard its or the person's property,
or to provide for such protection and safeguarding; and provide for the
protection and safeguarding of all critical infrastructure and key resources;
provided that without prejudice to the generality of the foregoing two clauses,
the protection and safeguarding may include the regulation or prohibition of
public entry thereon, or the permission of the entry upon such terms and
conditions as the mayor may prescribe;

(12) Restrict the congregation of the public in
stricken or dangerous areas or under dangerous conditions;

(13) Direct and control the non-compulsory evacuation
of the civilian population of the county;

(14) Order and direct government agencies, officials,
officers, and employees of the county, to take such action and employ such
measures for law enforcement, medical, health, firefighting, traffic control,
warnings and signals, engineering, rescue, construction, emergency housing, and
other welfare, hospitalization, transportation, water supply, public information,
training, and other emergency functions as may be necessary, and utilize the
services, materials, and facilities of the agencies and officers. All such
agencies and officers shall cooperate with and extend their services,
materials, and facilities to the mayor as the mayor may request;

(15) Provide for the repair and maintenance of public
property, whenever adequate provision therefor is not otherwise made; insure
the property against any emergency or disaster; provide for the restoration,
renovation, replacement, or reconstruction of insured property in the event of
damage or loss; and make temporary restoration of public utilities and other
critical infrastructure facilities in the event of an emergency or disaster;

(16) Fix or revise the hours of county government
business; and

(17) Take any and all steps necessary or appropriate
to carry out the purposes of this chapter notwithstanding that those powers in
section 127A-13(b) may only be exercised during an emergency period. [L 2014, c
111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next